Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1110.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 75 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a section to read:§ 1347.1. Special plates for individuals with autism spectrum disorder.(a) Design.--No later than 60 days after the effective date of this subsection, the department shall design a special registration plate for individuals with an autism spectrum disorder and shall include the phrase "Autistic/Neurodivergent" at the bottom.(b) Application.--Upon application of an individual with an autism spectrum disorder, or the owner of a vehicle in which an individual with an autism spectrum disorder is a frequent occupant, the department shall issue to that person a special 123456789101112131415161718 registration plate designating the vehicle as belonging to or being occupied by an individual with an autism spectrum disorder, which plate shall have the same effect as a regular registration plate.(c) Limitation on gross weight.--The special registration plate may be used only on a passenger car or truck with a registered gross weight of not more than 14,000 pounds.(d) Fee and accompanying information.--The application under subsection (b) shall be accompanied by:(1) A fee determined by the department, which may not exceed $14 and shall be in addition to the registration fee.(2) A sworn statement signed by a licensed physician that identifies the individual with an autism spectrum disorder.(3) Any other documentation that the department requires.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB1110PN1345 - 2 - 1234567891011121314151617